Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5277XS (3) 91 mb/md S.F. 2061 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 257.52 Nonpublic school safety 1 infrastructure fund ââ grant program. 2 1. A nonpublic school safety infrastructure fund is created 3 and established as a separate and distinct fund in the state 4 treasury under the control of the department of education. 5 2. a. In addition to moneys deposited in the nonpublic 6 school safety infrastructure fund pursuant to section 423F.2, 7 the department of education may accept gifts, grants, bequests, 8 and other private contributions, as well as state or federal 9 funds, and shall deposit the moneys in the fund to be used for 10 purposes of this section. Moneys in the fund are appropriated 11 to the department of education and shall be used only to 12 provide grants to nonpublic schools, as defined in section 13 285.16, for school safety and security infrastructure projects. 14 âSchool safety and security infrastructureâ means the same as 15 defined in section 423F.3. 16 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 17 that remain unawarded at the close of the fiscal year shall 18 not revert but shall remain in the fund for expenditure in 19 succeeding fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 20 subsection 2, interest earned on moneys in the nonpublic school 21 safety infrastructure fund shall be credited to the fund. 22 3. The department of education shall adopt rules to 23 establish and administer the grant program to provide for the 24 allocation of moneys in the fund in the form of competitive 25 grants to nonpublic schools for school safety and security 26 infrastructure in accordance with the purposes and objectives 27 of this section. The rules adopted by the department of 28 education shall specify the eligibility of applicants, eligible 29 items for grant funding, the application process, and the 30 maximum award per grant. 31 Sec. 2. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 32 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 (1) Prior to distribution of moneys in the secure an 34 advanced vision for education fund to school districts, an 35 -1- LSB 5277XS (3) 91 mb/md 1/ 2 S.F. 2061 amount equal to the equity transfer amount for the fiscal year 1 minus the foundation base transfer amount for the fiscal year 2 shall be distributed and credited to the property tax equity 3 and relief fund created in section 257.16A , an amount equal 4 to the foundation base transfer amount shall be distributed 5 and credited to the foundation base supplement fund created 6 in section 257.16D , and an amount equal to the career academy 7 transfer amount for the fiscal year shall be distributed and 8 credited to the career academy fund created in section 257.51 , 9 and for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, an 10 amount equal to one million dollars shall be distributed and 11 credited to the nonpublic school safety infrastructure fund 12 created in section 257.52 . 13